Utah statutes.
19-5-106.   Executive secretary -- Appointment -- Duties.
The executive secretary shall be appointed by the executive director with the
approval of the board, shall serve under the administrative direction of the
executive director, and has the following duties:
(1)  to develop programs for the prevention, control, and abatement of new or
existing pollution of the waters of the state;
(2)  to advise, consult, and cooperate with other agencies of the state, the
federal government, other states and interstate agencies, and with affected
groups, political subdivisions, and industries in furtherance of the purposes
of this chapter;
(3)  to employ full-time employees as  necessary to carry out the provisions
of this chapter;
(4)  as authorized by the board and subject to the provisions of this chapter,
to authorize any employee or representative of the department to enter at
reasonable times and upon reasonable notice in or upon public or private
property for the purposes of inspecting and investigating conditions and plant
records concerning possible water pollution;
(5)  to encourage, participate in, or conduct studies, investigations,
research, and demonstrations relating to water pollution and causes of water
pollution as necessary for the discharge of duties assigned under this
chapter, including the establishment of inventories of pollution sources;
(6)  to collect and disseminate information relating to water pollution and
the prevention, control, and abatement of water pollution;
(7)  to develop programs for the management of sewage sludge;
(8)  as authorized by the board and subject to the provisions of this chapter,
to enforce rules made by the board through the issuance of orders which may be
subsequently amended or revoked by the board, which orders may include:
(a)  prohibiting or abating discharges of wastes into the waters of the state;
(b)  requiring the construction of new control facilities or any parts of them
or the modification, extension, or alteration of existing control facilities
or any parts of them, or the adoption of other remedial measures to prevent,
control, or abate water pollution; and
(c)  prohibiting any other violation of this chapter or rules made under this
chapter;
(9)  to review plans, specifications, or other data relative to pollution
control systems or any part of the systems provided for in this chapter;
(10)  as authorized by the board and subject to the provisions of this
chapter, to exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes
of this chapter, including certification to any state or federal authorities
for tax purposes only if the fact of construction, installation, or
acquisition of any facility, land, or building, machinery, or equipment, or
any part of them conforms with this chapter;
(11)  to cooperate, where the board finds appropriate, with any person in
studies and research regarding water pollution and its control, abatement, and
prevention; and
(12)  to represent the state with the specific concurrence of the executive
director in all matters pertaining to water pollution, including interstate
compacts and other similar agreements.
